Utah statutes.
78B-10-111.   International commercial mediation.
(1)  In this section:
(a)  "International commercial mediation" means an international commercial
conciliation as defined in Article 1 of the Model Law.
(b)  "Model Law" means the Model Law on International Commercial Conciliation
adopted by the United Nations Commission on International Trade Law on 28 June
2002 and recommended by the United Nations General Assembly in a resolution
(A/RES/57/18) dated 19 November 2002.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (3) and (4), if a mediation
is an international commercial mediation, the mediation is governed by the
Model Law.
(3)  Unless the parties agree in accordance with Subsection 78B-10-103(3) that
all or part of an international commercial mediation is not privileged,
Sections 78B-10-104 through 78B-10-106 and any applicable definitions in
Section 78B-10-102 of this chapter apply to the mediation and nothing in
Article 10 of the Model Law derogates from Sections 78B-10-104 through
78B-10-106.
(4)  If the parties to an international commercial mediation agree under
Article 1, Section (7), of the Model Law that the Model Law does not apply,
this chapter applies.
